Illinois, session 104th, HB4205.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Use Tax Act is amended by changing Section 53-5 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 105/3-5)7    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use, which, on and after January 1, 82025, includes use by a lessee, of the following tangible 9personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:10    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 11society, association, foundation, institution, or 12organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 13organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 14for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 15personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 16purpose of resale by the enterprise.17    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 18Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 19operating, or promoting the county fair.20    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 21or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 22by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 23under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that   HB4205- 2 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 2support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 3services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 4music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 5orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 6organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 7and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 8effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 9otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 10purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 11by the Department.12    (4) Except as otherwise provided in this Act, personal 13property purchased by a governmental body, by a corporation, 14society, association, foundation, or institution organized and 15operated exclusively for charitable, religious, or educational 16purposes, or by a not-for-profit corporation, society, 17association, foundation, institution, or organization that has 18no compensated officers or employees and that is organized and 19operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 years of 20age or older. A limited liability company may qualify for the 21exemption under this paragraph only if the limited liability 22company is organized and operated exclusively for educational 23purposes. On and after July 1, 1987, however, no entity 24otherwise eligible for this exemption shall make tax-free 25purchases unless it has an active exemption identification 26number issued by the Department.  HB4205- 3 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    (5) Until July 1, 2003, a passenger car that is a 2replacement vehicle to the extent that the purchase price of 3the car is subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.4    (6) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 52004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 6equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 7and used, and including that manufactured on special order, 8certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for graphic 9arts production, and including machinery and equipment 10purchased for lease. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 11acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 12acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change upon 13a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, graphic 14arts machinery and equipment is included in the manufacturing 15and assembling machinery and equipment exemption under 16paragraph (18). 17    (7) Farm chemicals.18    (8) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 19coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 20United States of America, or the government of any foreign 21country, and bullion.22    (9) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 23student organization affiliated with an elementary or 24secondary school located in Illinois.25    (10) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile renting, 26as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation and Use Tax   HB4205- 4 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1Act.2    (11) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 3including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 4purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 5State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 6replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 7machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 8implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 9Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 10chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 11to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 12Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 13registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 14polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 15overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 16equipment under this item (11). Agricultural chemical tender 17tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 18motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 19on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 20of the tender is separately stated.21    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 22farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 23installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 24limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 25or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 26limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors,   HB4205- 5 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 2such equipment.3    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 4sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 5computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 6facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 7to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 8crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 9agricultural chemicals. 10    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 11also includes electrical power generation equipment used 12primarily for production agriculture. 13    This item (11) is exempt from the provisions of Section 143-90.15    (12) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 16to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 17to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 18conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 19destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 20the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 21domestic stopovers.22    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 23to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 24used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 25its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 26engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the   HB4205- 6 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 2at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 3origination to the city of final destination on the same 4aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 5that aircraft. 6    (13) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 7stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 8food and beverages purchased at retail from a retailer, to the 9extent that the proceeds of the service charge are in fact 10turned over as tips or as a substitute for tips to the 11employees who participate directly in preparing, serving, 12hosting or cleaning up the food or beverage function with 13respect to which the service charge is imposed.14    (14) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 15and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 16rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 17pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 18(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 19lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 20exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 21machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 22motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 23Vehicle Code.24    (15) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 25repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 26that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser   HB4205- 7 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 2photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.3    (16) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 4mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 5reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 6equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 7excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 8Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 9Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 10for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 11(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 12during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 1316, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456). 14    (17) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 15equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed by the 16retailer, certified by the user to be used only for the 17production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for consumption 18as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel for the personal 19use of the user, and not subject to sale or resale.20    (18) Manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 21used primarily in the process of manufacturing or assembling 22tangible personal property for wholesale or retail sale or 23lease, whether that sale or lease is made directly by the 24manufacturer or by some other person, whether the materials 25used in the process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 26person, or whether that sale or lease is made apart from or as   HB4205- 8 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1an incident to the seller's engaging in the service occupation 2of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, patterns, gauges, or 3other similar items of no commercial value on special order 4for a particular purchaser. The exemption provided by this 5paragraph (18) includes production related tangible personal 6property, as defined in Section 3-50, purchased on or after 7July 1, 2019. The exemption provided by this paragraph (18) 8does not include machinery and equipment used in (i) the 9generation of electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) 10the generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 11wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 12through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment of 13water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 14customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The provisions 15of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of existing law as to the 16meaning and scope of this exemption. Beginning on July 1, 172017, the exemption provided by this paragraph (18) includes, 18but is not limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, 19as defined in paragraph (6) of this Section. 20    (19) Personal property delivered to a purchaser or 21purchaser's donee inside Illinois when the purchase order for 22that personal property was received by a florist located 23outside Illinois who has a florist located inside Illinois 24deliver the personal property.25    (20) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 26for direct agricultural production.  HB4205- 9 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    (21) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 2meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 3Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 4Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 5Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 6racing for prizes. This item (21) is exempt from the 7provisions of Section 3-90, and the exemption provided for 8under this item (21) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 91995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 10January 1, 2008 for such taxes paid during the period 11beginning May 30, 2000 and ending on January 1, 2008. 12    (22) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 13any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 14analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a 15lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 16longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 17otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 18hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 19identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 20the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 21in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 22in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 23the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 24the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 25at the time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 26collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated)   HB4205- 10 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 2this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the 3tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 4collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 5have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 6lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 7for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 8Department.9    (23) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 10the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 11in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 12the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 13been issued an active sales tax exemption identification 14number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 15Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that 16does not qualify for this exemption or used in any other 17non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 18imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case 19may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 20time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 21attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 24has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 25collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 26have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the   HB4205- 11 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 2for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department.4    (24) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 5December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 6before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 7for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 8disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 9manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 10corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 11that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 12number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 13who reside within the declared disaster area.14    (25) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 15December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 16before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 17the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 18including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 19access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 20water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 21purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 22facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 23State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 24Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 25in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 26disaster.  HB4205- 12 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    (26) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 2at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 3used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 4provisions of Section 3-90.5    (27) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 61-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 7corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 8foundation, or institution that is determined by the 9Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 10educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 11corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 12foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 13for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 14schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 15useful branches of learning by methods common to public 16schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 17intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 18schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 19organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 20study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 21individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 22technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 23occupation.24    (28) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 25including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 26benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school,   HB4205- 13 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 2the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 3district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 4parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 5does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 6private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 7entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 8another individual or entity that sold the property for the 9purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 10from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 11exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.12    (29) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 132001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 14serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 15other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 16Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 17and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 18amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 19paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 20commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 21paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.22    (30) Beginning January 1, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 23food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 24premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 25soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 26consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines,   HB4205- 14 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 2materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 3use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 4assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 5resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 6the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 7in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 8Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.9    (31) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 10Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 11utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 12diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 13purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 14of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 15lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this 16Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 17identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 18the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 19in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 20in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 21the tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as 22the case may be, based on the fair market value of the property 23at the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall 24collect or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) 25that purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by 26this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the   HB4205- 15 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1tax has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 2collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 3have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the 4lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 5for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 6Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 7Section 3-90.8    (32) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 9Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 10who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 11executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 12subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 13that has been issued an active sales tax exemption 14identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 15the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased 16in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or used in 17any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the 18tax imposed under this Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the 19case may be, based on the fair market value of the property at 20the time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect 21or attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 22purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 23Act or the Service Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax 24has not been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly 25collects any such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall 26have a legal right to claim a refund of that amount from the   HB4205- 16 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1lessor. If, however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee 2for any reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 3Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 4Section 3-90.5    (33) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 2004, 6the use in this State of motor vehicles of the second division 7with a gross vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds and that 8are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 9Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on 10July 1, 2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State 11of motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 12vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that are 13subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed under 14Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and (iii) that 15are primarily used for commercial purposes. Through June 30, 162005, this exemption applies to repair and replacement parts 17added after the initial purchase of such a motor vehicle if 18that motor vehicle is used in a manner that would qualify for 19the rolling stock exemption otherwise provided for in this 20Act. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "used for 21commercial purposes" means the transportation of persons or 22property in furtherance of any commercial or industrial 23enterprise, whether for-hire or not. 24    (34) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 25used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 26supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental   HB4205- 17 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 2corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 3under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 4paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.5    (35) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 6December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 7and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 8of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 9repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 10includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 11refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 12maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 13exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 14components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 15replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 16power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 17installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 18supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 19sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 20latex gloves, and protective films. 21    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 2231, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 23tangible personal property by persons who modify, refurbish, 24complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 25hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 26approved repair station by the Federal Aviation   HB4205- 18 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 2operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 3Regulations. From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, 4this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying tangible 5personal property by: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, 6complete, repair, replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) 7hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 8approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 9Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 10operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 11Regulations; and (B) persons who engage in the modification, 12replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 13power plants without regard to whether or not those persons 14meet the qualifications of item (A). 15    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 16commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 17service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 18129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 19this paragraph (35) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 20existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 21exemption under this paragraph (35) applies continuously from 22January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 23for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 24the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 25and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 26101-629).  HB4205- 19 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    (36) Tangible personal property purchased by a 2public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 311-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 4constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 5only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 6transferred to the municipality without any further 7consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 8of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 9retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 10instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 11connection with the development of the municipal convention 12hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 13corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 14Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 15of Section 3-90. 16    (37) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 172026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 18    (38) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental Purchase 19Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser must certify 20that the item is purchased to be rented subject to a 21rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the Rental-Purchase 22Agreement Act, and provide proof of registration under the 23Rental Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax Act. This 24paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90.25    (39) Tangible personal property purchased by a purchaser 26who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of   HB4205- 20 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 2Section 3-90.3    (40) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 4construction or operation of a data center that has been 5granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 6Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 7personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 8tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 9of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 10have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 111, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect may apply for and 12obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 13equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 14supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 15purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 16qualified. 17    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 18grant a certificate of exemption under this item (40) to 19qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 20Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 21Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 22    For the purposes of this item (40): 23        "Data center" means a building or a series of 24    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 25    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 26    the State of Illinois.   HB4205- 21 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 2    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 3    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 4    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 5    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 6    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 7    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 8    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 9    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 10    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 11    systems; other cabling; and other data center 12    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 13    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 14    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 15    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 16    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 17    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 18    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 19    personal property; and all other tangible personal 20    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 21    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 22    property" also includes building materials physically 23    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 24    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 25    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 26    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and   HB4205- 22 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    Economic Opportunity. 2    This item (40) is exempt from the provisions of Section 33-90. 4    (41) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 5collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 6item (41) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. As 7used in this item (41): 8        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 9    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 10    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 11    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 12    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 13    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 14    time of sale. 15        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 16    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 17    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 18    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 19    milk until it is ready for consumption. 20        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 21    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 22    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 23    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 24    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 25    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 26    milk storage bags.   HB4205- 23 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 2    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 3    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 4    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 5    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 6    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 7    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 8    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 9    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 10    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 11    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 12    or distributor. 13        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 14    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 15    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 16    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 17    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 18    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 19    manufacturer or distributor. 20    (42) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 21the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 22Property Act. This item (42) is exempt from the provisions of 23Section 3-90. 24    (43) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 25property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 26forces of the United States who presents valid military   HB4205- 24 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1identification and purchases the property using a form of 2payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 3of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 4prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 5transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 6paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 7the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 8years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 9States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 10Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 11Section 3-90. 12    (44) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 13to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 14intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 15Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 16Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This item 17(44) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 18    (45) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 19Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 20consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 21alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 22use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 23prepared for immediate consumption). This item (45) is exempt 24from the provisions of Section 3-90. 25    (46) Use by the lessee of the following leased tangible 26personal property:  HB4205- 25 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 2    meets the following requirements:3            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 4        by the licensor and the customer;5                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 6            customer accepts the license by means of an 7            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 8            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 9            the license will comply with this requirement;10                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 11            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 12            agree" does not comply with this requirement;13            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 14        use of the software;15            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 16        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 17        party (except to a related party) without the 18        permission and continued control of the licensor;19            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 20        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 21        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 22        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 23        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 24        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 25        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 26        the licensor; and  HB4205- 26 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 2        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 3        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 4        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 5        forth in the license agreement; and6        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 7    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 8    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 9    January 1, 2023. 10    (47) On and after January 1, 2027, hearing aids. As used in 11this item (47), "hearing aid" means any wearable 12non-disposable, non-experimental instrument or device designed 13to aid or compensate for impaired human hearing and any parts, 14attachments, or accessories for the instrument or device, 15including an ear mold but excluding batteries and cords. This 16item (47) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-90. 17(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-5, eff. 6-7-23; 18103-9, Article 15, Section 15-5, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 196-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 20eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 21103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 22    Section 10. The Service Use Tax Act is amended by changing 23Section 3-5 as follows: 24    (35 ILCS 110/3-5)  HB4205- 27 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. Use of the following tangible 2personal property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:3    (1) Personal property purchased from a corporation, 4society, association, foundation, institution, or 5organization, other than a limited liability company, that is 6organized and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise 7for the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 8personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for the 9purpose of resale by the enterprise.10    (2) Personal property purchased by a non-profit Illinois 11county fair association for use in conducting, operating, or 12promoting the county fair.13    (3) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit arts 14or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 15by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 16under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 17is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 18support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 19services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 20music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 21orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 22organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 23and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 24effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 25otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 26purchases unless it has an active identification number issued   HB4205- 28 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1by the Department.2    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 3coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the 4United States of America, or the government of any foreign 5country, and bullion.6    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 72004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 8equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 9and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 10purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 11primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 12chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 13chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 14immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 15July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 16in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 17exemption under Section 2 of this Act.18    (6) Personal property purchased from a teacher-sponsored 19student organization affiliated with an elementary or 20secondary school located in Illinois.21    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 22including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 23purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 24State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 25replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 26machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including   HB4205- 29 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 2Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 3chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required 4to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 5Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 6registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 7polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 8overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 9equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 10tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 11motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 12on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 13of the tender is separately stated.14    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 15farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 16installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 17limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 18or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 19limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 20software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 21such equipment.22    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 23sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 24computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 25facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 26to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and   HB4205- 30 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 2agricultural chemicals. 3    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment 4also includes electrical power generation equipment used 5primarily for production agriculture. 6    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 73-75.8    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 9to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 10to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 11conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 12destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 13the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 14domestic stopovers.15    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 16to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 17used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 18its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 19engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 20United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 21at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 22origination to the city of final destination on the same 23aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 24that aircraft. 25    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 26stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of   HB4205- 31 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1food and beverages acquired as an incident to the purchase of a 2service from a serviceman, to the extent that the proceeds of 3the service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 4substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly 5in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 6beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 7imposed.8    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 9and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 10rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 11pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 12(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 13lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 14exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 15machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 16motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 17Vehicle Code.18    (11) Proceeds from the sale of photoprocessing machinery 19and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both 20new and used, including that manufactured on special order, 21certified by the purchaser to be used primarily for 22photoprocessing, and including photoprocessing machinery and 23equipment purchased for lease.24    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 25mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 26reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and   HB4205- 32 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 2excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 3Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 4Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 5for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 6(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 7during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 816, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).9    (13) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 10for direct agricultural production.11    (14) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 12meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 13Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 14Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 15Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 16racing for prizes. This item (14) is exempt from the 17provisions of Section 3-75, and the exemption provided for 18under this item (14) applies for all periods beginning May 30, 191995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 20January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 21such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 22ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 2395-88).24    (15) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 25any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 26analysis, or treatment of hospital patients purchased by a   HB4205- 33 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 2longer executed or in effect at the time the lessor would 3otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a 4hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 5identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 6the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 7in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 8in any other non-exempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 9the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 10may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 11time the non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 12attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 13purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 14Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 15been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 16such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 17right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 18however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 19reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 20Department.21    (16) Personal property purchased by a lessor who leases 22the property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 23in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be subject to 24the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body that has 25been issued an active tax exemption identification number by 26the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' Occupation   HB4205- 34 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that does not 2qualify for this exemption or is used in any other non-exempt 3manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax imposed under 4this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, based on the 5fair market value of the property at the time the 6non-qualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 7to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 8reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 9Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 10by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 11from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 12refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 13amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 14is liable to pay that amount to the Department.15    (17) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 16December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 17before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 18for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 19disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 20manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 21corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution 22that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 23number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 24who reside within the declared disaster area.25    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 26December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or   HB4205- 35 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 2the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 3including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 4access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 5water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 6purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 7facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 8State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 9Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 10in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 11disaster.12    (19) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds purchased 13at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is 14used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 15provisions of Section 3-75.16    (20) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 171-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 18corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 19foundation, or institution that is determined by the 20Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 21educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a 22corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 23foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 24for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 25schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 26useful branches of learning by methods common to public   HB4205- 36 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 2intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 3schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 4organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 5study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 6individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 7technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 8occupation.9    (21) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 10including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 11benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 12a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 13the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 14district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 15parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 16does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 17private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 18entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 19another individual or entity that sold the property for the 20purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 21from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is 22exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.23    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 242001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 25serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 26other items, and replacement parts for these machines.   HB4205- 37 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 2and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 3amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 4paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 5commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 6paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.7    (23) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 2016, 8food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 9premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 10soft drinks, and food that has been prepared for immediate 11consumption) and prescription and nonprescription medicines, 12drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 13materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 14use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 15assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 16resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 17the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 18in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 19Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.20    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 21Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 22utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 23diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 24purchased by a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease 25of one year or longer executed or in effect at the time the 26lessor would otherwise be subject to the tax imposed by this   HB4205- 38 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1Act, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 2identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 3the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. If the equipment is leased 4in a manner that does not qualify for this exemption or is used 5in any other nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for 6the tax imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case 7may be, based on the fair market value of the property at the 8time the nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or 9attempt to collect an amount (however designated) that 10purports to reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this 11Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not 12been paid by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any 13such amount from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal 14right to claim a refund of that amount from the lessor. If, 15however, that amount is not refunded to the lessee for any 16reason, the lessor is liable to pay that amount to the 17Department. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 18Section 3-75.19    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 20Public Act 92-227), personal property purchased by a lessor 21who leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 22executed or in effect at the time the lessor would otherwise be 23subject to the tax imposed by this Act, to a governmental body 24that has been issued an active tax exemption identification 25number by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 26Occupation Tax Act. If the property is leased in a manner that   HB4205- 39 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1does not qualify for this exemption or is used in any other 2nonexempt manner, the lessor shall be liable for the tax 3imposed under this Act or the Use Tax Act, as the case may be, 4based on the fair market value of the property at the time the 5nonqualifying use occurs. No lessor shall collect or attempt 6to collect an amount (however designated) that purports to 7reimburse that lessor for the tax imposed by this Act or the 8Use Tax Act, as the case may be, if the tax has not been paid 9by the lessor. If a lessor improperly collects any such amount 10from the lessee, the lessee shall have a legal right to claim a 11refund of that amount from the lessor. If, however, that 12amount is not refunded to the lessee for any reason, the lessor 13is liable to pay that amount to the Department. This paragraph 14is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75.15    (26) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 16used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 17supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 18Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 19corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 20under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 21paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 22    (27) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 23December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 24and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 25of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, 26repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption   HB4205- 40 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 2refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 3maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 4exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 5components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 6replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 7power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 8installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 9supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 10sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 11latex gloves, and protective films. 12    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 1331, 2023, this exemption applies only to the use of qualifying 14tangible personal property transferred incident to the 15modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 16or maintenance of aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 17Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 18repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 19have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 20accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 21From January 1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption 22applies only to the use of qualifying tangible personal 23property transferred incident to: (A) the modification, 24refurbishment, completion, repair, replacement, or maintenance 25of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air Agency 26Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved repair   HB4205- 41 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a 2Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance 3with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) the 4modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft 5engines or power plants without regard to whether or not those 6persons meet the qualifications of item (A).7    The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 8commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 9service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 10129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The changes made to 11this paragraph (27) by Public Act 98-534 are declarative of 12existing law. It is the intent of the General Assembly that the 13exemption under this paragraph (27) applies continuously from 14January 1, 2010 through December 31, 2024; however, no claim 15for credit or refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of 16the disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 17and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of Public Act 18101-629).19    (28) Tangible personal property purchased by a 20public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 2111-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 22constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 23only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 24transferred to the municipality without any further 25consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 26of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the   HB4205- 42 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 2instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 3connection with the development of the municipal convention 4hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 5corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 6Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 7of Section 3-75. 8    (29) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 92026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 10    (30) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 11who is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act by operation of 12federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 13Section 3-75. 14    (31) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 15construction or operation of a data center that has been 16granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 17Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 18personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 19tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 20of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 21have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 221, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 23obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 24equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 25supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 26purchased or leased in the original investment that would have   HB4205- 43 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1qualified. 2    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 3grant a certificate of exemption under this item (31) to 4qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 5Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 6Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 7    For the purposes of this item (31): 8        "Data center" means a building or a series of 9    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 10    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 11    the State of Illinois. 12        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 13    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 14    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 15    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 16    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 17    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 18    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 19    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 20    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 21    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 22    systems; other cabling; and other data center 23    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 24    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 25    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 26    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and   HB4205- 44 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 2    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 3    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 4    personal property; and all other tangible personal 5    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 6    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 7    property" also includes building materials physically 8    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 9    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 10    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 11    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 12    Economic Opportunity. 13    This item (31) is exempt from the provisions of Section 143-75. 15    (32) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 16collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 17item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. As 18used in this item (32): 19        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 20    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 21    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 22    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 23    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 24    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 25    time of sale. 26        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means   HB4205- 45 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 2    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 3    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 4    milk until it is ready for consumption. 5        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 6    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 7    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 8    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 9    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 10    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 11    milk storage bags. 12        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 13    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 14    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 15    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 16    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 17    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 18    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 19    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 20    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 21    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 22    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 23    or distributor. 24        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 25    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 26    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the   HB4205- 46 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 2    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 3    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 4    manufacturer or distributor. 5    (33) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 6the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 7Property Act. This item (33) is exempt from the provisions of 8Section 3-75. 9    (34) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 10property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 11forces of the United States who presents valid military 12identification and purchases the property using a form of 13payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 14of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 15prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the 16transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 17paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 18the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 19years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 20States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 21Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 22Section 3-75. 23    (35) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 24to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 25intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 26Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage   HB4205- 47 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 2paragraph (35) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 3    (36) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 4Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 5transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 6or the Service Occupation Tax Act by an entity licensed under 7the Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 8Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 9Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 10Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 11an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 12Facilities Act. This item (36) is exempt from the provisions 13of Section 3-75. 14    (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 15Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be 16consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 17alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 18use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 19prepared for immediate consumption). This item (37) is exempt 20from the provisions of Section 3-75. 21    (38) Use by a lessee of the following leased tangible 22personal property:23        (1) software transferred subject to a license that 24    meets the following requirements:25            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 26        by the licensor and the customer;  HB4205- 48 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 2            customer accepts the license by means of an 3            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 4            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 5            the license will comply with this requirement;6                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 7            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 8            agree" does not comply with this requirement;9            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 10        use of the software;11            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 12        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 13        party (except to a related party) without the 14        permission and continued control of the licensor;15            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another 16        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 17        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 18        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 19        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 20        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 21        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 22        the licensor; and23            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 24        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 25        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 26        the case of a perpetual license, without being set   HB4205- 49 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1        forth in the license agreement; and2        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 3    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 4    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 5    January 1, 2023. 6    (39) On and after January 1, 2027, hearing aids. As used in 7this item (39), "hearing aid" means any wearable 8non-disposable, non-experimental instrument or device designed 9to aid or compensate for impaired human hearing and any parts, 10attachments, or accessories for the instrument or device, 11including an ear mold but excluding batteries and cords. This 12item (39) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-75. 13(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-10, eff. 6-7-23; 14103-9, Article 15, Section 15-10, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 156-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 16eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 17103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-417, eff. 188-15-25.) 19    Section 15. The Service Occupation Tax Act is amended by 20changing Section 3-5 as follows: 21    (35 ILCS 115/3-5)22    Sec. 3-5. Exemptions. The following tangible personal 23property is exempt from the tax imposed by this Act:24    (1) Personal property sold by a corporation, society,   HB4205- 50 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1association, foundation, institution, or organization, other 2than a limited liability company, that is organized and 3operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for the 4benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the personal 5property was not purchased by the enterprise for the purpose 6of resale by the enterprise.7    (2) Personal property purchased by a not-for-profit 8Illinois county fair association for use in conducting, 9operating, or promoting the county fair.10    (3) Personal property purchased by any not-for-profit arts 11or cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 12by the Department by rule, that it has received an exemption 13under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and that 14is organized and operated primarily for the presentation or 15support of arts or cultural programming, activities, or 16services. These organizations include, but are not limited to, 17music and dramatic arts organizations such as symphony 18orchestras and theatrical groups, arts and cultural service 19organizations, local arts councils, visual arts organizations, 20and media arts organizations. On and after July 1, 2001 (the 21effective date of Public Act 92-35), however, an entity 22otherwise eligible for this exemption shall not make tax-free 23purchases unless it has an active identification number issued 24by the Department.25    (4) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or silver 26coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the government of the   HB4205- 51 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1United States of America, or the government of any foreign 2country, and bullion.3    (5) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again on September 1, 42004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery and 5equipment, including repair and replacement parts, both new 6and used, and including that manufactured on special order or 7purchased for lease, certified by the purchaser to be used 8primarily for graphic arts production. Equipment includes 9chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts but only if the 10chemicals or chemicals acting as catalysts effect a direct and 11immediate change upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on 12July 1, 2017, graphic arts machinery and equipment is included 13in the manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 14exemption under Section 2 of this Act.15    (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored student 16organization affiliated with an elementary or secondary school 17located in Illinois.18    (7) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 19including that manufactured on special order, certified by the 20purchaser to be used primarily for production agriculture or 21State or federal agricultural programs, including individual 22replacement parts for the machinery and equipment, including 23machinery and equipment purchased for lease, and including 24implements of husbandry defined in Section 1-130 of the 25Illinois Vehicle Code, farm machinery and agricultural 26chemical and fertilizer spreaders, and nurse wagons required   HB4205- 52 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1to be registered under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle 2Code, but excluding other motor vehicles required to be 3registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural 4polyhouses or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 5overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery and 6equipment under this item (7). Agricultural chemical tender 7tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold separately from a 8motor vehicle required to be licensed and units sold mounted 9on a motor vehicle required to be licensed if the selling price 10of the tender is separately stated.11    Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 12farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 13installed on farm machinery and equipment, including, but not 14limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, seeders, 15or spreaders. Precision farming equipment includes, but is not 16limited to, soil testing sensors, computers, monitors, 17software, global positioning and mapping systems, and other 18such equipment.19    Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 20sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in the 21computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 22facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not limited 23to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of animal and 24crop data for the purpose of formulating animal diets and 25agricultural chemicals. 26    Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and equipment   HB4205- 53 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1also includes electrical power generation equipment used 2primarily for production agriculture. 3    This item (7) is exempt from the provisions of Section 43-55.5    (8) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 6to or used by an air common carrier, certified by the carrier 7to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 8conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a flight 9destined for or returning from a location or locations outside 10the United States without regard to previous or subsequent 11domestic stopovers.12    Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products sold 13to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier to be 14used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the conduct of 15its business as an air common carrier, for a flight that (i) is 16engaged in foreign trade or is engaged in trade between the 17United States and any of its possessions and (ii) transports 18at least one individual or package for hire from the city of 19origination to the city of final destination on the same 20aircraft, without regard to a change in the flight number of 21that aircraft. 22    (9) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 23stated on customers' bills for the purchase and consumption of 24food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 25service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 26substitute for tips to the employees who participate directly   HB4205- 54 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the food or 2beverage function with respect to which the service charge is 3imposed.4    (10) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, drilling, 5and production equipment, including (i) rigs and parts of 6rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover rigs, (ii) 7pipe and tubular goods, including casing and drill strings, 8(iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) storage tanks and flow 9lines, (v) any individual replacement part for oil field 10exploration, drilling, and production equipment, and (vi) 11machinery and equipment purchased for lease; but excluding 12motor vehicles required to be registered under the Illinois 13Vehicle Code.14    (11) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, including 15repair and replacement parts, both new and used, including 16that manufactured on special order, certified by the purchaser 17to be used primarily for photoprocessing, and including 18photoprocessing machinery and equipment purchased for lease.19    (12) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate exploration, 20mining, off-highway hauling, processing, maintenance, and 21reclamation equipment, including replacement parts and 22equipment, and including equipment purchased for lease, but 23excluding motor vehicles required to be registered under the 24Illinois Vehicle Code. The changes made to this Section by 25Public Act 97-767 apply on and after July 1, 2003, but no claim 26for credit or refund is allowed on or after August 16, 2013   HB4205- 55 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1(the effective date of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid 2during the period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 316, 2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).4    (13) Beginning January 1, 1992 and through June 30, 2016, 5food for human consumption that is to be consumed off the 6premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic beverages, 7soft drinks and food that has been prepared for immediate 8consumption) and prescription and non-prescription medicines, 9drugs, medical appliances, and insulin, urine testing 10materials, syringes, and needles used by diabetics, for human 11use, when purchased for use by a person receiving medical 12assistance under Article V of the Illinois Public Aid Code who 13resides in a licensed long-term care facility, as defined in 14the Nursing Home Care Act, or in a licensed facility as defined 15in the ID/DD Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the 16Specialized Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.17    (14) Semen used for artificial insemination of livestock 18for direct agricultural production.19    (15) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with and 20meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse Club 21Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American Quarter 22Horse Association, United States Trotting Association, or 23Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for purposes of breeding or 24racing for prizes. This item (15) is exempt from the 25provisions of Section 3-55, and the exemption provided for 26under this item (15) applies for all periods beginning May 30,   HB4205- 56 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b11995, but no claim for credit or refund is allowed on or after 2January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for 3such taxes paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and 4ending on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 595-88).6    (16) Computers and communications equipment utilized for 7any hospital purpose and equipment used in the diagnosis, 8analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor 9who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 10executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 11hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 12identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 13the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act.14    (17) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 15property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or in 16effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental body that 17has been issued an active tax exemption identification number 18by the Department under Section 1g of the Retailers' 19Occupation Tax Act.20    (18) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 21December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 22before December 31, 2004, personal property that is donated 23for disaster relief to be used in a State or federally declared 24disaster area in Illinois or bordering Illinois by a 25manufacturer or retailer that is registered in this State to a 26corporation, society, association, foundation, or institution   HB4205- 57 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1that has been issued a sales tax exemption identification 2number by the Department that assists victims of the disaster 3who reside within the declared disaster area.4    (19) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 5December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on or 6before December 31, 2004, personal property that is used in 7the performance of infrastructure repairs in this State, 8including, but not limited to, municipal roads and streets, 9access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal systems, 10water and sewer line extensions, water distribution and 11purification facilities, storm water drainage and retention 12facilities, and sewage treatment facilities, resulting from a 13State or federally declared disaster in Illinois or bordering 14Illinois when such repairs are initiated on facilities located 15in the declared disaster area within 6 months after the 16disaster.17    (20) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold at a 18"game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that term is used 19in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is exempt from the 20provisions of Section 3-55.21    (21) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in Section 221-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is donated to a 23corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 24foundation, or institution that is determined by the 25Department to be organized and operated exclusively for 26educational purposes. For purposes of this exemption, "a   HB4205- 58 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1corporation, limited liability company, society, association, 2foundation, or institution organized and operated exclusively 3for educational purposes" means all tax-supported public 4schools, private schools that offer systematic instruction in 5useful branches of learning by methods common to public 6schools and that compare favorably in their scope and 7intensity with the course of study presented in tax-supported 8schools, and vocational or technical schools or institutes 9organized and operated exclusively to provide a course of 10study of not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 11individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 12technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 13occupation.14    (22) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 15including food, purchased through fundraising events for the 16benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary school, 17a group of those schools, or one or more school districts if 18the events are sponsored by an entity recognized by the school 19district that consists primarily of volunteers and includes 20parents and teachers of the school children. This paragraph 21does not apply to fundraising events (i) for the benefit of 22private home instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising 23entity purchases the personal property sold at the events from 24another individual or entity that sold the property for the 25purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that profits 26from the sale to the fundraising entity. This paragraph is   HB4205- 59 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.2    (23) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December 31, 32001, new or used automatic vending machines that prepare and 4serve hot food and beverages, including coffee, soup, and 5other items, and replacement parts for these machines. 6Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 2003, machines 7and parts for machines used in commercial, coin-operated 8amusement and vending business if a use or occupation tax is 9paid on the gross receipts derived from the use of the 10commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending machines. This 11paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55.12    (24) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 13Public Act 92-227), computers and communications equipment 14utilized for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 15diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients sold to 16a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of one year or 17longer executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 18hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 19identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 20the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 21from the provisions of Section 3-55.22    (25) Beginning on August 2, 2001 (the effective date of 23Public Act 92-227), personal property sold to a lessor who 24leases the property, under a lease of one year or longer 25executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 26governmental body that has been issued an active tax exemption   HB4205- 60 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1identification number by the Department under Section 1g of 2the Retailers' Occupation Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt 3from the provisions of Section 3-55.4    (26) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 52016, tangible personal property purchased from an Illinois 6retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized purchasing 7activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt of the property 8in Illinois, temporarily store the property in Illinois (i) 9for the purpose of subsequently transporting it outside this 10State for use or consumption thereafter solely outside this 11State or (ii) for the purpose of being processed, fabricated, 12or manufactured into, attached to, or incorporated into other 13tangible personal property to be transported outside this 14State and thereafter used or consumed solely outside this 15State. The Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules 16adopted in accordance with the Illinois Administrative 17Procedure Act, issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing 18with the Department who is eligible for the exemption under 19this paragraph (26). The permit issued under this paragraph 20(26) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 21manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 22purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 23from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall maintain 24all necessary books and records to substantiate the use and 25consumption of all such tangible personal property outside of 26the State of Illinois.  HB4205- 61 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    (27) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal property 2used in the construction or maintenance of a community water 3supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of the Environmental 4Protection Act, that is operated by a not-for-profit 5corporation that holds a valid water supply permit issued 6under Title IV of the Environmental Protection Act. This 7paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 8    (28) Tangible personal property sold to a 9public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 1011-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 11constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, but 12only if the legal title to the municipal convention hall is 13transferred to the municipality without any further 14consideration by or on behalf of the municipality at the time 15of the completion of the municipal convention hall or upon the 16retirement or redemption of any bonds or other debt 17instruments issued by the public-facilities corporation in 18connection with the development of the municipal convention 19hall. This exemption includes existing public-facilities 20corporations as provided in Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois 21Municipal Code. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 22of Section 3-55. 23    (29) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 24December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, components, 25and furnishings incorporated into or upon an aircraft as part 26of the modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement,   HB4205- 62 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1repair, or maintenance of the aircraft. This exemption 2includes consumable supplies used in the modification, 3refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, and 4maintenance of aircraft. However, until January 1, 2024, this 5exemption excludes any materials, parts, equipment, 6components, and consumable supplies used in the modification, 7replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft engines or 8power plants, whether such engines or power plants are 9installed or uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable 10supplies" include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 11sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 12latex gloves, and protective films. 13    Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through December 1431, 2023, this exemption applies only to the transfer of 15qualifying tangible personal property incident to the 16modification, refurbishment, completion, replacement, repair, 17or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) hold an Air 18Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an approved 19repair station by the Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) 20have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in 21accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. 22The exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 23commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 24service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or Part 25129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 1, 2024 26through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies only to the   HB4205- 63 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1transfer of qualifying tangible personal property incident to: 2(A) the modification, refurbishment, completion, repair, 3replacement, or maintenance of an aircraft by persons who (i) 4hold an Air Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 5approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 6Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) conduct 7operations in accordance with Part 145 of the Federal Aviation 8Regulations; and (B) the modification, replacement, repair, 9and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants without 10regard to whether or not those persons meet the qualifications 11of item (A).12    The changes made to this paragraph (29) by Public Act 1398-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent of the 14General Assembly that the exemption under this paragraph (29) 15applies continuously from January 1, 2010 through December 31, 162024; however, no claim for credit or refund is allowed for 17taxes paid as a result of the disallowance of this exemption on 18or after January 1, 2015 and prior to February 5, 2020 (the 19effective date of Public Act 101-629).20    (30) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 31, 212026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 22    (31) Tangible personal property transferred to a purchaser 23who is exempt from tax by operation of federal law. This 24paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 25    (32) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 26construction or operation of a data center that has been   HB4205- 64 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 2Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 3personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 4tenant of the data center or by a contractor or subcontractor 5of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data centers that would 6have qualified for a certificate of exemption prior to January 71, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 been in effect, may apply for and 8obtain an exemption for subsequent purchases of computer 9equipment or enabling software purchased or leased to upgrade, 10supplement, or replace computer equipment or enabling software 11purchased or leased in the original investment that would have 12qualified. 13    The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity shall 14grant a certificate of exemption under this item (32) to 15qualified data centers as defined by Section 605-1025 of the 16Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity Law of the 17Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 18    For the purposes of this item (32): 19        "Data center" means a building or a series of 20    buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house working 21    servers in one physical location or multiple sites within 22    the State of Illinois. 23        "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 24    electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 25    chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 26    equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency   HB4205- 65 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 2    devices; network connectivity equipment; racks; cabinets; 3    telecommunications cabling infrastructure; raised floor 4    systems; peripheral components or systems; software; 5    mechanical, electrical, or plumbing systems; battery 6    systems; cooling systems and towers; temperature control 7    systems; other cabling; and other data center 8    infrastructure equipment and systems necessary to operate 9    qualified tangible personal property, including fixtures; 10    and component parts of any of the foregoing, including 11    installation, maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and 12    replacement of qualified tangible personal property to 13    generate, transform, transmit, distribute, or manage 14    electricity necessary to operate qualified tangible 15    personal property; and all other tangible personal 16    property that is essential to the operations of a computer 17    data center. The term "qualified tangible personal 18    property" also includes building materials physically 19    incorporated into the qualifying data center. To document 20    the exemption allowed under this Section, the retailer 21    must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the certificate 22    of eligibility issued by the Department of Commerce and 23    Economic Opportunity. 24    This item (32) is exempt from the provisions of Section 253-55. 26    (33) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump   HB4205- 66 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. This 2item (33) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. As 3used in this item (33): 4        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 5    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 6    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 7    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 8    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 9    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 10    time of sale. 11        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 12    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 13    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 14    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 15    milk until it is ready for consumption. 16        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 17    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 18    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 19    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 20    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 21    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 22    milk storage bags. 23        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 24    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 25    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 26    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice   HB4205- 67 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 2    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 3    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 4    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 5    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 6    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 7    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 8    or distributor. 9        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 10    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and 11    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 12    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 13    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 14    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 15    manufacturer or distributor. 16    (34) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf of 17the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform Unclaimed 18Property Act. This item (34) is exempt from the provisions of 19Section 3-55.20    (35) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 21property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 22forces of the United States who presents valid military 23identification and purchases the property using a form of 24payment where the federal government is the payor. The member 25of the armed forces must complete, at the point of sale, a form 26prescribed by the Department of Revenue documenting that the   HB4205- 68 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1transaction is eligible for the exemption under this 2paragraph. Retailers must keep the form as documentation of 3the exemption in their records for a period of not less than 6 4years. "Armed forces of the United States" means the United 5States Army, Navy, Air Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or 6Coast Guard. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions of 7Section 3-55. 8    (36) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals provided 9to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment is made by an 10intermediary, such as a Medicare Administrative Contractor, a 11Managed Care Organization, or a Medicare Advantage 12Organization, pursuant to a government contract. This 13paragraph (36) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 14    (37) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 15Section 3-10, food prepared for immediate consumption and 16transferred incident to a sale of service subject to this Act 17or the Service Use Tax Act by an entity licensed under the 18Hospital Licensing Act, the Nursing Home Care Act, the 19Assisted Living and Shared Housing Act, the ID/DD Community 20Care Act, the MC/DD Act, the Specialized Mental Health 21Rehabilitation Act of 2013, or the Child Care Act of 1969 or by 22an entity that holds a permit issued pursuant to the Life Care 23Facilities Act. This item (37) is exempt from the provisions 24of Section 3-55. 25    (38) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined in 26Section 3-10, food for human consumption that is to be   HB4205- 69 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 2alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with adult 3use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has been 4prepared for immediate consumption). This item (38) is exempt 5from the provisions of Section 3-55. 6    (39) The lease of the following tangible personal 7property:8        (1) computer software transferred subject to a license 9    that meets the following requirements:10            (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement signed 11        by the licensor and the customer;12                (i) an electronic agreement in which the 13            customer accepts the license by means of an 14            electronic signature that is verifiable and can be 15            authenticated and is attached to or made part of 16            the license will comply with this requirement;17                (ii) a license agreement in which the customer 18            electronically accepts the terms by clicking "I 19            agree" does not comply with this requirement;20            (B) it restricts the customer's duplication and 21        use of the software;22            (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 23        sublicensing, or transferring the software to a third 24        party (except to a related party) without the 25        permission and continued control of the licensor;26            (D) the licensor has a policy of providing another   HB4205- 70 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1        copy at minimal or no charge if the customer loses or 2        damages the software, or of permitting the licensee to 3        make and keep an archival copy, and such policy is 4        either stated in the license agreement, supported by 5        the licensor's books and records, or supported by a 6        notarized statement made under penalties of perjury by 7        the licensor; and8            (E) the customer must destroy or return all copies 9        of the software to the licensor at the end of the 10        license period; this provision is deemed to be met, in 11        the case of a perpetual license, without being set 12        forth in the license agreement; and13        (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 14    receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local government 15    if the ordinance imposing that tax was adopted prior to 16    January 1, 2023. 17    (40) On and after January 1, 2027, hearing aids. As used in 18this item (40), "hearing aid" means any wearable 19non-disposable, non-experimental instrument or device designed 20to aid or compensate for impaired human hearing and any parts, 21attachments, or accessories for the instrument or device, 22including an ear mold but excluding batteries and cords. This 23item (40) is exempt from the provisions of Section 3-55. 24(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-15, eff. 6-7-23; 25103-9, Article 15, Section 15-15, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 266-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605,   HB4205- 71 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 2103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-417, eff. 38-15-25.) 4    Section 20. The Retailers' Occupation Tax Act is amended 5by changing Section 2-5 as follows: 6    (35 ILCS 120/2-5)7    Sec. 2-5. Exemptions. Gross receipts from proceeds from 8the sale, which, on and after January 1, 2025, includes the 9lease, of the following tangible personal property are exempt 10from the tax imposed by this Act:11        (1) Farm chemicals.12        (2) Farm machinery and equipment, both new and used, 13    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 14    the purchaser to be used primarily for production 15    agriculture or State or federal agricultural programs, 16    including individual replacement parts for the machinery 17    and equipment, including machinery and equipment purchased 18    for lease, and including implements of husbandry defined 19    in Section 1-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, farm 20    machinery and agricultural chemical and fertilizer 21    spreaders, and nurse wagons required to be registered 22    under Section 3-809 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, but 23    excluding other motor vehicles required to be registered 24    under the Illinois Vehicle Code. Horticultural polyhouses   HB4205- 72 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    or hoop houses used for propagating, growing, or 2    overwintering plants shall be considered farm machinery 3    and equipment under this item (2). Agricultural chemical 4    tender tanks and dry boxes shall include units sold 5    separately from a motor vehicle required to be licensed 6    and units sold mounted on a motor vehicle required to be 7    licensed, if the selling price of the tender is separately 8    stated.9        Farm machinery and equipment shall include precision 10    farming equipment that is installed or purchased to be 11    installed on farm machinery and equipment including, but 12    not limited to, tractors, harvesters, sprayers, planters, 13    seeders, or spreaders. Precision farming equipment 14    includes, but is not limited to, soil testing sensors, 15    computers, monitors, software, global positioning and 16    mapping systems, and other such equipment.17        Farm machinery and equipment also includes computers, 18    sensors, software, and related equipment used primarily in 19    the computer-assisted operation of production agriculture 20    facilities, equipment, and activities such as, but not 21    limited to, the collection, monitoring, and correlation of 22    animal and crop data for the purpose of formulating animal 23    diets and agricultural chemicals. 24        Beginning on January 1, 2024, farm machinery and 25    equipment also includes electrical power generation 26    equipment used primarily for production agriculture.   HB4205- 73 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1        This item (2) is exempt from the provisions of Section 2    2-70.3        (3) Until July 1, 2003, distillation machinery and 4    equipment, sold as a unit or kit, assembled or installed 5    by the retailer, certified by the user to be used only for 6    the production of ethyl alcohol that will be used for 7    consumption as motor fuel or as a component of motor fuel 8    for the personal use of the user, and not subject to sale 9    or resale.10        (4) Until July 1, 2003 and beginning again September 11    1, 2004 through August 30, 2014, graphic arts machinery 12    and equipment, including repair and replacement parts, 13    both new and used, and including that manufactured on 14    special order or purchased for lease, certified by the 15    purchaser to be used primarily for graphic arts 16    production. Equipment includes chemicals or chemicals 17    acting as catalysts but only if the chemicals or chemicals 18    acting as catalysts effect a direct and immediate change 19    upon a graphic arts product. Beginning on July 1, 2017, 20    graphic arts machinery and equipment is included in the 21    manufacturing and assembling machinery and equipment 22    exemption under paragraph (14).23        (5) A motor vehicle that is used for automobile 24    renting, as defined in the Automobile Renting Occupation 25    and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 26    provisions of Section 2-70.  HB4205- 74 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1        (6) Personal property sold by a teacher-sponsored 2    student organization affiliated with an elementary or 3    secondary school located in Illinois.4        (7) Until July 1, 2003, proceeds of that portion of 5    the selling price of a passenger car the sale of which is 6    subject to the Replacement Vehicle Tax.7        (8) Personal property sold to an Illinois county fair 8    association for use in conducting, operating, or promoting 9    the county fair.10        (9) Personal property sold to a not-for-profit arts or 11    cultural organization that establishes, by proof required 12    by the Department by rule, that it has received an 13    exemption under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue 14    Code and that is organized and operated primarily for the 15    presentation or support of arts or cultural programming, 16    activities, or services. These organizations include, but 17    are not limited to, music and dramatic arts organizations 18    such as symphony orchestras and theatrical groups, arts 19    and cultural service organizations, local arts councils, 20    visual arts organizations, and media arts organizations. 21    On and after July 1, 2001 (the effective date of Public Act 22    92-35), however, an entity otherwise eligible for this 23    exemption shall not make tax-free purchases unless it has 24    an active identification number issued by the Department.25        (10) Personal property sold by a corporation, society, 26    association, foundation, institution, or organization,   HB4205- 75 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    other than a limited liability company, that is organized 2    and operated as a not-for-profit service enterprise for 3    the benefit of persons 65 years of age or older if the 4    personal property was not purchased by the enterprise for 5    the purpose of resale by the enterprise.6        (11) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, 7    personal property sold to a governmental body, to a 8    corporation, society, association, foundation, or 9    institution organized and operated exclusively for 10    charitable, religious, or educational purposes, or to a 11    not-for-profit corporation, society, association, 12    foundation, institution, or organization that has no 13    compensated officers or employees and that is organized 14    and operated primarily for the recreation of persons 55 15    years of age or older. A limited liability company may 16    qualify for the exemption under this paragraph only if the 17    limited liability company is organized and operated 18    exclusively for educational purposes. On and after July 1, 19    1987, however, no entity otherwise eligible for this 20    exemption shall make tax-free purchases unless it has an 21    active identification number issued by the Department.22        (12) (Blank).23        (12-5) On and after July 1, 2003 and through June 30, 24    2004, motor vehicles of the second division with a gross 25    vehicle weight in excess of 8,000 pounds that are subject 26    to the commercial distribution fee imposed under Section   HB4205- 76 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. Beginning on July 1, 2    2004 and through June 30, 2005, the use in this State of 3    motor vehicles of the second division: (i) with a gross 4    vehicle weight rating in excess of 8,000 pounds; (ii) that 5    are subject to the commercial distribution fee imposed 6    under Section 3-815.1 of the Illinois Vehicle Code; and 7    (iii) that are primarily used for commercial purposes. 8    Through June 30, 2005, this exemption applies to repair 9    and replacement parts added after the initial purchase of 10    such a motor vehicle if that motor vehicle is used in a 11    manner that would qualify for the rolling stock exemption 12    otherwise provided for in this Act. For purposes of this 13    paragraph, "used for commercial purposes" means the 14    transportation of persons or property in furtherance of 15    any commercial or industrial enterprise whether for-hire 16    or not. 17        (13) Proceeds from sales to owners or lessors, 18    lessees, or shippers of tangible personal property that is 19    utilized by interstate carriers for hire for use as 20    rolling stock moving in interstate commerce and equipment 21    operated by a telecommunications provider, licensed as a 22    common carrier by the Federal Communications Commission, 23    which is permanently installed in or affixed to aircraft 24    moving in interstate commerce.25        (14) Machinery and equipment that will be used by the 26    purchaser, or a lessee of the purchaser, primarily in the   HB4205- 77 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    process of manufacturing or assembling tangible personal 2    property for wholesale or retail sale or lease, whether 3    the sale or lease is made directly by the manufacturer or 4    by some other person, whether the materials used in the 5    process are owned by the manufacturer or some other 6    person, or whether the sale or lease is made apart from or 7    as an incident to the seller's engaging in the service 8    occupation of producing machines, tools, dies, jigs, 9    patterns, gauges, or other similar items of no commercial 10    value on special order for a particular purchaser. The 11    exemption provided by this paragraph (14) does not include 12    machinery and equipment used in (i) the generation of 13    electricity for wholesale or retail sale; (ii) the 14    generation or treatment of natural or artificial gas for 15    wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to customers 16    through pipes, pipelines, or mains; or (iii) the treatment 17    of water for wholesale or retail sale that is delivered to 18    customers through pipes, pipelines, or mains. The 19    provisions of Public Act 98-583 are declaratory of 20    existing law as to the meaning and scope of this 21    exemption. Beginning on July 1, 2017, the exemption 22    provided by this paragraph (14) includes, but is not 23    limited to, graphic arts machinery and equipment, as 24    defined in paragraph (4) of this Section.25        (15) Proceeds of mandatory service charges separately 26    stated on customers' bills for purchase and consumption of   HB4205- 78 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    food and beverages, to the extent that the proceeds of the 2    service charge are in fact turned over as tips or as a 3    substitute for tips to the employees who participate 4    directly in preparing, serving, hosting or cleaning up the 5    food or beverage function with respect to which the 6    service charge is imposed. 7        (16) Tangible personal property sold to a purchaser if 8    the purchaser is exempt from use tax by operation of 9    federal law. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 10    of Section 2-70. 11        (17) Tangible personal property sold to a common 12    carrier by rail or motor that receives the physical 13    possession of the property in Illinois and that transports 14    the property, or shares with another common carrier in the 15    transportation of the property, out of Illinois on a 16    standard uniform bill of lading showing the seller of the 17    property as the shipper or consignor of the property to a 18    destination outside Illinois, for use outside Illinois.19        (18) Legal tender, currency, medallions, or gold or 20    silver coinage issued by the State of Illinois, the 21    government of the United States of America, or the 22    government of any foreign country, and bullion.23        (19) Until July 1, 2003, oil field exploration, 24    drilling, and production equipment, including (i) rigs and 25    parts of rigs, rotary rigs, cable tool rigs, and workover 26    rigs, (ii) pipe and tubular goods, including casing and   HB4205- 79 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    drill strings, (iii) pumps and pump-jack units, (iv) 2    storage tanks and flow lines, (v) any individual 3    replacement part for oil field exploration, drilling, and 4    production equipment, and (vi) machinery and equipment 5    purchased for lease; but excluding motor vehicles required 6    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code.7        (20) Photoprocessing machinery and equipment, 8    including repair and replacement parts, both new and used, 9    including that manufactured on special order, certified by 10    the purchaser to be used primarily for photoprocessing, 11    and including photoprocessing machinery and equipment 12    purchased for lease.13        (21) Until July 1, 2028, coal and aggregate 14    exploration, mining, off-highway hauling, processing, 15    maintenance, and reclamation equipment, including 16    replacement parts and equipment, and including equipment 17    purchased for lease, but excluding motor vehicles required 18    to be registered under the Illinois Vehicle Code. The 19    changes made to this Section by Public Act 97-767 apply on 20    and after July 1, 2003, but no claim for credit or refund 21    is allowed on or after August 16, 2013 (the effective date 22    of Public Act 98-456) for such taxes paid during the 23    period beginning July 1, 2003 and ending on August 16, 24    2013 (the effective date of Public Act 98-456).25        (22) Until June 30, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 26    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier   HB4205- 80 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 2    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 3    flight destined for or returning from a location or 4    locations outside the United States without regard to 5    previous or subsequent domestic stopovers.6        Beginning July 1, 2013, fuel and petroleum products 7    sold to or used by an air carrier, certified by the carrier 8    to be used for consumption, shipment, or storage in the 9    conduct of its business as an air common carrier, for a 10    flight that (i) is engaged in foreign trade or is engaged 11    in trade between the United States and any of its 12    possessions and (ii) transports at least one individual or 13    package for hire from the city of origination to the city 14    of final destination on the same aircraft, without regard 15    to a change in the flight number of that aircraft. 16        (23) A transaction in which the purchase order is 17    received by a florist who is located outside Illinois, but 18    who has a florist located in Illinois deliver the property 19    to the purchaser or the purchaser's donee in Illinois.20        (24) Fuel consumed or used in the operation of ships, 21    barges, or vessels that are used primarily in or for the 22    transportation of property or the conveyance of persons 23    for hire on rivers bordering on this State if the fuel is 24    delivered by the seller to the purchaser's barge, ship, or 25    vessel while it is afloat upon that bordering river.26        (25) Except as provided in items (25-5) and (25-6) of   HB4205- 81 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    this Section, a motor vehicle sold in this State to a 2    nonresident even though the motor vehicle is delivered to 3    the nonresident in this State, if the motor vehicle is not 4    to be titled in this State, and if a drive-away permit is 5    issued to the motor vehicle as provided in Section 3-603 6    of the Illinois Vehicle Code or if the nonresident 7    purchaser has vehicle registration plates to transfer to 8    the motor vehicle upon returning to his or her home state. 9    The issuance of the drive-away permit or having the 10    out-of-state registration plates to be transferred is 11    prima facie evidence that the motor vehicle will not be 12    titled in this State.13        (25-5) The exemption under item (25) does not apply if 14    the state in which the motor vehicle will be titled does 15    not allow a reciprocal exemption for a motor vehicle sold 16    and delivered in that state to an Illinois resident but 17    titled in Illinois. The tax collected under this Act on 18    the sale of a motor vehicle in this State to a resident of 19    another state that does not allow a reciprocal exemption 20    shall be imposed at a rate equal to the state's rate of tax 21    on taxable property in the state in which the purchaser is 22    a resident, except that the tax shall not exceed the tax 23    that would otherwise be imposed under this Act. At the 24    time of the sale, the purchaser shall execute a statement, 25    signed under penalty of perjury, of his or her intent to 26    title the vehicle in the state in which the purchaser is a   HB4205- 82 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    resident within 30 days after the sale and of the fact of 2    the payment to the State of Illinois of tax in an amount 3    equivalent to the state's rate of tax on taxable property 4    in his or her state of residence and shall submit the 5    statement to the appropriate tax collection agency in his 6    or her state of residence. In addition, the retailer must 7    retain a signed copy of the statement in his or her 8    records. Nothing in this item shall be construed to 9    require the removal of the vehicle from this state 10    following the filing of an intent to title the vehicle in 11    the purchaser's state of residence if the purchaser titles 12    the vehicle in his or her state of residence within 30 days 13    after the date of sale. The tax collected under this Act in 14    accordance with this item (25-5) shall be proportionately 15    distributed as if the tax were collected at the 6.25% 16    general rate imposed under this Act. 17        (25-6) There is a rebuttable presumption that the 18    exemption under item (25) does not apply if the purchaser 19    is a limited liability company and a member of the limited 20    liability company is a resident of Illinois. This 21    presumption may be rebutted by other evidence, such as 22    evidence the motor vehicle is insured at a garaging or 23    storage address outside Illinois or other evidence of the 24    physical address at which the motor vehicle will be 25    permanently stored or garaged outside Illinois. 26        (25-7) Beginning on July 1, 2007, no tax is imposed   HB4205- 83 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    under this Act on the sale of an aircraft, as defined in 2    Section 3 of the Illinois Aeronautics Act, if all of the 3    following conditions are met:4            (1) the aircraft leaves this State within 15 days 5        after the later of either the issuance of the final 6        billing for the sale of the aircraft, or the 7        authorized approval for return to service, completion 8        of the maintenance record entry, and completion of the 9        test flight and ground test for inspection, as 10        required by 14 CFR 91.407;11            (2) the aircraft is not based or registered in 12        this State after the sale of the aircraft; and13            (3) the seller retains in his or her books and 14        records and provides to the Department a signed and 15        dated certification from the purchaser, on a form 16        prescribed by the Department, certifying that the 17        requirements of this item (25-7) are met. The 18        certificate must also include the name and address of 19        the purchaser, the address of the location where the 20        aircraft is to be titled or registered, the address of 21        the primary physical location of the aircraft, and 22        other information that the Department may reasonably 23        require.24        For purposes of this item (25-7):25        "Based in this State" means hangared, stored, or 26    otherwise used, excluding post-sale customizations as   HB4205- 84 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    defined in this Section, for 10 or more days in each 2    12-month period immediately following the date of the sale 3    of the aircraft.4        "Registered in this State" means an aircraft 5    registered with the Department of Transportation, 6    Aeronautics Division, or titled or registered with the 7    Federal Aviation Administration to an address located in 8    this State.9        This paragraph (25-7) is exempt from the provisions of 10    Section 2-70. 11        (26) Semen used for artificial insemination of 12    livestock for direct agricultural production.13        (27) Horses, or interests in horses, registered with 14    and meeting the requirements of any of the Arabian Horse 15    Club Registry of America, Appaloosa Horse Club, American 16    Quarter Horse Association, United States Trotting 17    Association, or Jockey Club, as appropriate, used for 18    purposes of breeding or racing for prizes. This item (27) 19    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70, and the 20    exemption provided for under this item (27) applies for 21    all periods beginning May 30, 1995, but no claim for 22    credit or refund is allowed on or after January 1, 2008 23    (the effective date of Public Act 95-88) for such taxes 24    paid during the period beginning May 30, 2000 and ending 25    on January 1, 2008 (the effective date of Public Act 26    95-88).  HB4205- 85 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1        (28) Computers and communications equipment utilized 2    for any hospital purpose and equipment used in the 3    diagnosis, analysis, or treatment of hospital patients 4    sold to a lessor who leases the equipment, under a lease of 5    one year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 6    purchase, to a hospital that has been issued an active tax 7    exemption identification number by the Department under 8    Section 1g of this Act.9        (29) Personal property sold to a lessor who leases the 10    property, under a lease of one year or longer executed or 11    in effect at the time of the purchase, to a governmental 12    body that has been issued an active tax exemption 13    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 14    of this Act.15        (30) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after 16    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 17    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 18    donated for disaster relief to be used in a State or 19    federally declared disaster area in Illinois or bordering 20    Illinois by a manufacturer or retailer that is registered 21    in this State to a corporation, society, association, 22    foundation, or institution that has been issued a sales 23    tax exemption identification number by the Department that 24    assists victims of the disaster who reside within the 25    declared disaster area.26        (31) Beginning with taxable years ending on or after   HB4205- 86 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    December 31, 1995 and ending with taxable years ending on 2    or before December 31, 2004, personal property that is 3    used in the performance of infrastructure repairs in this 4    State, including, but not limited to, municipal roads and 5    streets, access roads, bridges, sidewalks, waste disposal 6    systems, water and sewer line extensions, water 7    distribution and purification facilities, storm water 8    drainage and retention facilities, and sewage treatment 9    facilities, resulting from a State or federally declared 10    disaster in Illinois or bordering Illinois when such 11    repairs are initiated on facilities located in the 12    declared disaster area within 6 months after the disaster.13        (32) Beginning July 1, 1999, game or game birds sold 14    at a "game breeding and hunting preserve area" as that 15    term is used in the Wildlife Code. This paragraph is 16    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.17        (33) A motor vehicle, as that term is defined in 18    Section 1-146 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, that is 19    donated to a corporation, limited liability company, 20    society, association, foundation, or institution that is 21    determined by the Department to be organized and operated 22    exclusively for educational purposes. For purposes of this 23    exemption, "a corporation, limited liability company, 24    society, association, foundation, or institution organized 25    and operated exclusively for educational purposes" means 26    all tax-supported public schools, private schools that   HB4205- 87 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    offer systematic instruction in useful branches of 2    learning by methods common to public schools and that 3    compare favorably in their scope and intensity with the 4    course of study presented in tax-supported schools, and 5    vocational or technical schools or institutes organized 6    and operated exclusively to provide a course of study of 7    not less than 6 weeks duration and designed to prepare 8    individuals to follow a trade or to pursue a manual, 9    technical, mechanical, industrial, business, or commercial 10    occupation.11        (34) Beginning January 1, 2000, personal property, 12    including food, purchased through fundraising events for 13    the benefit of a public or private elementary or secondary 14    school, a group of those schools, or one or more school 15    districts if the events are sponsored by an entity 16    recognized by the school district that consists primarily 17    of volunteers and includes parents and teachers of the 18    school children. This paragraph does not apply to 19    fundraising events (i) for the benefit of private home 20    instruction or (ii) for which the fundraising entity 21    purchases the personal property sold at the events from 22    another individual or entity that sold the property for 23    the purpose of resale by the fundraising entity and that 24    profits from the sale to the fundraising entity. This 25    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.26        (35) Beginning January 1, 2000 and through December   HB4205- 88 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    31, 2001, new or used automatic vending machines that 2    prepare and serve hot food and beverages, including 3    coffee, soup, and other items, and replacement parts for 4    these machines. Beginning January 1, 2002 and through June 5    30, 2003, machines and parts for machines used in 6    commercial, coin-operated amusement and vending business 7    if a use or occupation tax is paid on the gross receipts 8    derived from the use of the commercial, coin-operated 9    amusement and vending machines. This paragraph is exempt 10    from the provisions of Section 2-70.11        (35-5) Beginning August 23, 2001 and through June 30, 12    2016, food for human consumption that is to be consumed 13    off the premises where it is sold (other than alcoholic 14    beverages, soft drinks, and food that has been prepared 15    for immediate consumption) and prescription and 16    nonprescription medicines, drugs, medical appliances, and 17    insulin, urine testing materials, syringes, and needles 18    used by diabetics, for human use, when purchased for use 19    by a person receiving medical assistance under Article V 20    of the Illinois Public Aid Code who resides in a licensed 21    long-term care facility, as defined in the Nursing Home 22    Care Act, or a licensed facility as defined in the ID/DD 23    Community Care Act, the MC/DD Act, or the Specialized 24    Mental Health Rehabilitation Act of 2013.25        (36) Beginning August 2, 2001, computers and 26    communications equipment utilized for any hospital purpose   HB4205- 89 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    and equipment used in the diagnosis, analysis, or 2    treatment of hospital patients sold to a lessor who leases 3    the equipment, under a lease of one year or longer 4    executed or in effect at the time of the purchase, to a 5    hospital that has been issued an active tax exemption 6    identification number by the Department under Section 1g 7    of this Act. This paragraph is exempt from the provisions 8    of Section 2-70.9        (37) Beginning August 2, 2001, personal property sold 10    to a lessor who leases the property, under a lease of one 11    year or longer executed or in effect at the time of the 12    purchase, to a governmental body that has been issued an 13    active tax exemption identification number by the 14    Department under Section 1g of this Act. This paragraph is 15    exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70.16        (38) Beginning on January 1, 2002 and through June 30, 17    2016, tangible personal property purchased from an 18    Illinois retailer by a taxpayer engaged in centralized 19    purchasing activities in Illinois who will, upon receipt 20    of the property in Illinois, temporarily store the 21    property in Illinois (i) for the purpose of subsequently 22    transporting it outside this State for use or consumption 23    thereafter solely outside this State or (ii) for the 24    purpose of being processed, fabricated, or manufactured 25    into, attached to, or incorporated into other tangible 26    personal property to be transported outside this State and   HB4205- 90 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    thereafter used or consumed solely outside this State. The 2    Director of Revenue shall, pursuant to rules adopted in 3    accordance with the Illinois Administrative Procedure Act, 4    issue a permit to any taxpayer in good standing with the 5    Department who is eligible for the exemption under this 6    paragraph (38). The permit issued under this paragraph 7    (38) shall authorize the holder, to the extent and in the 8    manner specified in the rules adopted under this Act, to 9    purchase tangible personal property from a retailer exempt 10    from the taxes imposed by this Act. Taxpayers shall 11    maintain all necessary books and records to substantiate 12    the use and consumption of all such tangible personal 13    property outside of the State of Illinois.14        (39) Beginning January 1, 2008, tangible personal 15    property used in the construction or maintenance of a 16    community water supply, as defined under Section 3.145 of 17    the Environmental Protection Act, that is operated by a 18    not-for-profit corporation that holds a valid water supply 19    permit issued under Title IV of the Environmental 20    Protection Act. This paragraph is exempt from the 21    provisions of Section 2-70. 22        (40) Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 23    December 31, 2029, materials, parts, equipment, 24    components, and furnishings incorporated into or upon an 25    aircraft as part of the modification, refurbishment, 26    completion, replacement, repair, or maintenance of the   HB4205- 91 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    aircraft. This exemption includes consumable supplies used 2    in the modification, refurbishment, completion, 3    replacement, repair, and maintenance of aircraft. However, 4    until January 1, 2024, this exemption excludes any 5    materials, parts, equipment, components, and consumable 6    supplies used in the modification, replacement, repair, 7    and maintenance of aircraft engines or power plants, 8    whether such engines or power plants are installed or 9    uninstalled upon any such aircraft. "Consumable supplies" 10    include, but are not limited to, adhesive, tape, 11    sandpaper, general purpose lubricants, cleaning solution, 12    latex gloves, and protective films. 13        Beginning January 1, 2010 and continuing through 14    December 31, 2023, this exemption applies only to the sale 15    of qualifying tangible personal property to persons who 16    modify, refurbish, complete, replace, or maintain an 17    aircraft and who (i) hold an Air Agency Certificate and 18    are empowered to operate an approved repair station by the 19    Federal Aviation Administration, (ii) have a Class IV 20    Rating, and (iii) conduct operations in accordance with 21    Part 145 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. The 22    exemption does not include aircraft operated by a 23    commercial air carrier providing scheduled passenger air 24    service pursuant to authority issued under Part 121 or 25    Part 129 of the Federal Aviation Regulations. From January 26    1, 2024 through December 31, 2029, this exemption applies   HB4205- 92 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    only to the sale of qualifying tangible personal property 2    to: (A) persons who modify, refurbish, complete, repair, 3    replace, or maintain aircraft and who (i) hold an Air 4    Agency Certificate and are empowered to operate an 5    approved repair station by the Federal Aviation 6    Administration, (ii) have a Class IV Rating, and (iii) 7    conduct operations in accordance with Part 145 of the 8    Federal Aviation Regulations; and (B) persons who engage 9    in the modification, replacement, repair, and maintenance 10    of aircraft engines or power plants without regard to 11    whether or not those persons meet the qualifications of 12    item (A).13        The changes made to this paragraph (40) by Public Act 14    98-534 are declarative of existing law. It is the intent 15    of the General Assembly that the exemption under this 16    paragraph (40) applies continuously from January 1, 2010 17    through December 31, 2024; however, no claim for credit or 18    refund is allowed for taxes paid as a result of the 19    disallowance of this exemption on or after January 1, 2015 20    and prior to February 5, 2020 (the effective date of 21    Public Act 101-629).22        (41) Tangible personal property sold to a 23    public-facilities corporation, as described in Section 24    11-65-10 of the Illinois Municipal Code, for purposes of 25    constructing or furnishing a municipal convention hall, 26    but only if the legal title to the municipal convention   HB4205- 93 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    hall is transferred to the municipality without any 2    further consideration by or on behalf of the municipality 3    at the time of the completion of the municipal convention 4    hall or upon the retirement or redemption of any bonds or 5    other debt instruments issued by the public-facilities 6    corporation in connection with the development of the 7    municipal convention hall. This exemption includes 8    existing public-facilities corporations as provided in 9    Section 11-65-25 of the Illinois Municipal Code. This 10    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 11        (42) Beginning January 1, 2017 and through December 12    31, 2026, menstrual pads, tampons, and menstrual cups. 13        (43) Merchandise that is subject to the Rental 14    Purchase Agreement Occupation and Use Tax. The purchaser 15    must certify that the item is purchased to be rented 16    subject to a rental-purchase agreement, as defined in the 17    Rental-Purchase Agreement Act, and provide proof of 18    registration under the Rental Purchase Agreement 19    Occupation and Use Tax Act. This paragraph is exempt from 20    the provisions of Section 2-70.21        (44) Qualified tangible personal property used in the 22    construction or operation of a data center that has been 23    granted a certificate of exemption by the Department of 24    Commerce and Economic Opportunity, whether that tangible 25    personal property is purchased by the owner, operator, or 26    tenant of the data center or by a contractor or   HB4205- 94 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    subcontractor of the owner, operator, or tenant. Data 2    centers that would have qualified for a certificate of 3    exemption prior to January 1, 2020 had Public Act 101-31 4    been in effect, may apply for and obtain an exemption for 5    subsequent purchases of computer equipment or enabling 6    software purchased or leased to upgrade, supplement, or 7    replace computer equipment or enabling software purchased 8    or leased in the original investment that would have 9    qualified. 10        The Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity 11    shall grant a certificate of exemption under this item 12    (44) to qualified data centers as defined by Section 13    605-1025 of the Department of Commerce and Economic 14    Opportunity Law of the Civil Administrative Code of 15    Illinois. 16        For the purposes of this item (44): 17            "Data center" means a building or a series of 18        buildings rehabilitated or constructed to house 19        working servers in one physical location or multiple 20        sites within the State of Illinois. 21            "Qualified tangible personal property" means: 22        electrical systems and equipment; climate control and 23        chilling equipment and systems; mechanical systems and 24        equipment; monitoring and secure systems; emergency 25        generators; hardware; computers; servers; data storage 26        devices; network connectivity equipment; racks;   HB4205- 95 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1        cabinets; telecommunications cabling infrastructure; 2        raised floor systems; peripheral components or 3        systems; software; mechanical, electrical, or plumbing 4        systems; battery systems; cooling systems and towers; 5        temperature control systems; other cabling; and other 6        data center infrastructure equipment and systems 7        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 8        property, including fixtures; and component parts of 9        any of the foregoing, including installation, 10        maintenance, repair, refurbishment, and replacement of 11        qualified tangible personal property to generate, 12        transform, transmit, distribute, or manage electricity 13        necessary to operate qualified tangible personal 14        property; and all other tangible personal property 15        that is essential to the operations of a computer data 16        center. The term "qualified tangible personal 17        property" also includes building materials physically 18        incorporated into the qualifying data center. To 19        document the exemption allowed under this Section, the 20        retailer must obtain from the purchaser a copy of the 21        certificate of eligibility issued by the Department of 22        Commerce and Economic Opportunity. 23        This item (44) is exempt from the provisions of 24    Section 2-70. 25        (45) Beginning January 1, 2020 and through December 26    31, 2020, sales of tangible personal property made by a   HB4205- 96 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    marketplace seller over a marketplace for which tax is due 2    under this Act but for which use tax has been collected and 3    remitted to the Department by a marketplace facilitator 4    under Section 2d of the Use Tax Act are exempt from tax 5    under this Act. A marketplace seller claiming this 6    exemption shall maintain books and records demonstrating 7    that the use tax on such sales has been collected and 8    remitted by a marketplace facilitator. Marketplace sellers 9    that have properly remitted tax under this Act on such 10    sales may file a claim for credit as provided in Section 6 11    of this Act. No claim is allowed, however, for such taxes 12    for which a credit or refund has been issued to the 13    marketplace facilitator under the Use Tax Act, or for 14    which the marketplace facilitator has filed a claim for 15    credit or refund under the Use Tax Act. 16        (46) Beginning July 1, 2022, breast pumps, breast pump 17    collection and storage supplies, and breast pump kits. 18    This item (46) is exempt from the provisions of Section 19    2-70. As used in this item (46): 20        "Breast pump" means an electrically controlled or 21    manually controlled pump device designed or marketed to be 22    used to express milk from a human breast during lactation, 23    including the pump device and any battery, AC adapter, or 24    other power supply unit that is used to power the pump 25    device and is packaged and sold with the pump device at the 26    time of sale.   HB4205- 97 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" means 2    items of tangible personal property designed or marketed 3    to be used in conjunction with a breast pump to collect 4    milk expressed from a human breast and to store collected 5    milk until it is ready for consumption. 6        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" 7    includes, but is not limited to: breast shields and breast 8    shield connectors; breast pump tubes and tubing adapters; 9    breast pump valves and membranes; backflow protectors and 10    backflow protector adaptors; bottles and bottle caps 11    specific to the operation of the breast pump; and breast 12    milk storage bags. 13        "Breast pump collection and storage supplies" does not 14    include: (1) bottles and bottle caps not specific to the 15    operation of the breast pump; (2) breast pump travel bags 16    and other similar carrying accessories, including ice 17    packs, labels, and other similar products; (3) breast pump 18    cleaning supplies; (4) nursing bras, bra pads, breast 19    shells, and other similar products; and (5) creams, 20    ointments, and other similar products that relieve 21    breastfeeding-related symptoms or conditions of the 22    breasts or nipples, unless sold as part of a breast pump 23    kit that is pre-packaged by the breast pump manufacturer 24    or distributor. 25        "Breast pump kit" means a kit that: (1) contains no 26    more than a breast pump, breast pump collection and   HB4205- 98 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    storage supplies, a rechargeable battery for operating the 2    breast pump, a breastmilk cooler, bottle stands, ice 3    packs, and a breast pump carrying case; and (2) is 4    pre-packaged as a breast pump kit by the breast pump 5    manufacturer or distributor. 6        (47) Tangible personal property sold by or on behalf 7    of the State Treasurer pursuant to the Revised Uniform 8    Unclaimed Property Act. This item (47) is exempt from the 9    provisions of Section 2-70. 10        (48) Beginning on January 1, 2024, tangible personal 11    property purchased by an active duty member of the armed 12    forces of the United States who presents valid military 13    identification and purchases the property using a form of 14    payment where the federal government is the payor. The 15    member of the armed forces must complete, at the point of 16    sale, a form prescribed by the Department of Revenue 17    documenting that the transaction is eligible for the 18    exemption under this paragraph. Retailers must keep the 19    form as documentation of the exemption in their records 20    for a period of not less than 6 years. "Armed forces of the 21    United States" means the United States Army, Navy, Air 22    Force, Space Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard. This 23    paragraph is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 24        (49) Beginning July 1, 2024, home-delivered meals 25    provided to Medicare or Medicaid recipients when payment 26    is made by an intermediary, such as a Medicare   HB4205- 99 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1    Administrative Contractor, a Managed Care Organization, or 2    a Medicare Advantage Organization, pursuant to a 3    government contract. This paragraph (49) is exempt from 4    the provisions of Section 2-70. 5        (50) Beginning on January 1, 2026, as further defined 6    in Section 2-10, food for human consumption that is to be 7    consumed off the premises where it is sold (other than 8    alcoholic beverages, food consisting of or infused with 9    adult use cannabis, soft drinks, candy, and food that has 10    been prepared for immediate consumption). This item (50) 11    is exempt from the provisions of Section 2-70. 12        (51) Gross receipts from the lease of the following 13    tangible personal property:14            (1) computer software transferred subject to a 15        license that meets the following requirements:16                (A) it is evidenced by a written agreement 17            signed by the licensor and the customer;18                    (i) an electronic agreement in which the 19                customer accepts the license by means of an 20                electronic signature that is verifiable and 21                can be authenticated and is attached to or 22                made part of the license will comply with this 23                requirement;24                    (ii) a license agreement in which the 25                customer electronically accepts the terms by 26                clicking "I agree" does not comply with this   HB4205- 100 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1                requirement;2                (B) it restricts the customer's duplication 3            and use of the software;4                (C) it prohibits the customer from licensing, 5            sublicensing, or transferring the software to a 6            third party (except to a related party) without 7            the permission and continued control of the 8            licensor;9                (D) the licensor has a policy of providing 10            another copy at minimal or no charge if the 11            customer loses or damages the software, or of 12            permitting the licensee to make and keep an 13            archival copy, and such policy is either stated in 14            the license agreement, supported by the licensor's 15            books and records, or supported by a notarized 16            statement made under penalties of perjury by the 17            licensor; and18                (E) the customer must destroy or return all 19            copies of the software to the licensor at the end 20            of the license period; this provision is deemed to 21            be met, in the case of a perpetual license, 22            without being set forth in the license agreement; 23            and24            (2) property that is subject to a tax on lease 25        receipts imposed by a home rule unit of local 26        government if the ordinance imposing that tax was   HB4205- 101 -LRB104 15978 HLH 29223 b1        adopted prior to January 1, 2023. 2        (52) On and after January 1, 2027, hearing aids. As 3    used in this item (52), "hearing aid" means any wearable 4    non-disposable, non-experimental instrument or device 5    designed to aid or compensate for impaired human hearing 6    and any parts, attachments, or accessories for the 7    instrument or device, including an ear mold but excluding 8    batteries and cords. This item (52) is exempt from the 9    provisions of Section 2-70. 10(Source: P.A. 103-9, Article 5, Section 5-20, eff. 6-7-23; 11103-9, Article 15, Section 15-20, eff. 6-7-23; 103-154, eff. 126-30-23; 103-384, eff. 1-1-24; 103-592, eff. 1-1-25; 103-605, 13eff. 7-1-24; 103-643, eff. 7-1-24; 103-746, eff. 1-1-25; 14103-781, eff. 8-5-24; 103-995, eff. 8-9-24; 104-6, eff. 156-16-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25.) 16    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 17becoming law.